Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-879.2c, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-879.2c. A. 1. Pursuant to rules promulgated under
the provisions of the Alzheimer's Dementia and Other Forms of
Dementia Special Care Disclosure Act, any nursing facility,
residential care facility, assisted living facility, adult day care
center, continuum of care facility, or special care facility that
HB2262 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

publ icly advertises, intentionally markets, or otherwise engages in
promotional campaigns for the purpose of communicating that said
facility offers care, memory care, or treatment methods within the
facility that distinguish it as being especially applicable to or
suitable to persons with Alzheimer's dementia or other forms of
dementia diagnoses shall disclose the type of care, memory care or
treatment provided that distinguishes it as being especially
applicable to or suitable for such persons.
2. The disclosure shall be made using a form developed by the
State Department of Health and shall be made to:
a. the Department,
b. any representative of a person with Alzheimer's
dementia or other form of dementia who is considering
placement within a special care unit, program, or
facility, and
c. the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman.
3. A referral agency, when disclosing documents pursuant to
Section 1-866.2 of this title shall provide any representative of a
person with Alzheimer's dementia or other form of dementia who is
considering placement within a unit, program, or facility the form
for each facility the referral agency recommends.
4. The facility shall submit the disclosure form to the
Department prior to entering into any agreement to provide care or
services.
HB2262 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. 5. The Department shall examine each disclosure for
completeness and accuracy at the time the disclosure is submitted to
the Department.
5. 6. The Department shall review the most recent disclosure in
the Department's records during the facility's regular inspection to
verify that the disclosure is current and that the services
described in the disclosure are provided to residents as described
in the disclosure.
7. The facility shall conspicuously post or display in the
facility or designated area that is providing care for persons with
Alzheimer's dementia or other forms of dementia a complaint poster
that if they were not given a copy of the disclosure form that they
may file a complaint with the Attorney General's Consumer Protection
Unit.
B. The information disclosed as required by this section shall
include the following areas:
1. A written description of the special care unit, program, or
facility's overall philosophy and mission as it relates to the needs
of residents with Alzheimer's dementia or other forms of dementia;
2. The process and criteria for placement in, or transfer or
discharge from, the unit, program, or facility;
3. The process used for assessment, establishment, and
implementation of a resident plan of care, as it relates to
Alzheimer's dementia and other forms of dementia, including the
HB2262 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

meth od by which the plan evolves, the frequency of assessment, and
how the facility will respond to changes in the condition of the
resident;
4. Staff-to-resident ratios, staff training and continuing
education that are in addition to all regularly prescribed training
and are commensurate with the need for increased care and
supervision for residents with Alzheimer's dementia and other forms
of dementia;
5. The physical environment and design features appropriate to
support the functioning of cognitively impaired residents;
6. The types and frequency of resident activities designed for
residents with Alzheimer's dementia or other forms of dementia and
descriptions of those therapeutic activities designed to address
cognitive function and engage residents with varying stages of
dementia;
7. The involvement of families in care planning and other
aspects of care, and the availability of family support programs;
8. The fees for care and any additional fees; and
9. Any accreditations or certifications issued to the facility
related to the care and services provided to residents with
Alzheimer's dementia or other forms of dementia.
C. Any individual employed or contracted by a registered long-
term care facility who publicly advertises, intentionally markets,
or otherwise engages in promotional campaigns for the purpose of
HB2262 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

comm unicating that said facility offers memory care, Alzheimer's
care, or dementia care if said facility does not meet the criteria
of a memory care, Alzheimer's care, or dementia care facility shall
be subject to penalties as outlined in section H of the Alzheimer's
Dementia and Other Forms of Dementia Special Care
Disclosure Act.
D. The Department, with input from the Alzheimer-Dementia
Disclosure Act Advisory Council, shall develop a standardized
disclosure form. Any change in the information initially submitted
by the facility or other entity shall be reported to the Department
at the time the change is made.
D. E. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
preclude a facility without a special care unit or program from
admitting a person with Alzheimer's dementia or other forms of
dementia.
E. F. The State Commissioner of Health, with input from the
Alzheimer-Dementia Disclosure Act Advisory Council, shall promulgate
rules to effectuate the provisions of the Alzheimer's Dementia and
Other Forms of Dementia Special Care Disclosure Act.
F. G. There is hereby created the Alzheimer-Dementia Disclosure
Act Advisory Council. The Council shall make recommendations to the
State Commissioner of Health regarding the disclosure form and rules
promulgated pursuant to the Alzheimer's Dementia and Other Forms of
Dementia Special Care Disclosure Act.
HB2262 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. The Council shall consist of nine (9) members to be
appointed by the State Commissioner of Health for such terms as he
or she chooses. The members shall be individuals who have knowledge
and expertise in the field of memory care or individuals who are
consumer representatives directly impacted by memory-care services,
provided that neither the members with knowledge and expertise in
the field nor the members who are consumer representatives shall
comprise more than two-thirds (2/3) of the total membership. The
members who are consumer representatives shall be individuals with
immediate family members who have received or are currently
receiving memory-care services in Oklahoma and shall not be
employees or board members of any facilities or entities subject to
the Alzheimer's Dementia and Other Forms of Dementia Special Care
Disclosure Act.
2. The members of the Council shall serve without compensation.
3. The Council shall conduct an organizational meeting at a
date and location to be chosen by the Commissioner and as frequently
thereafter as necessary to perform the duties imposed upon it. A
majority of the members present shall constitute a quorum.
4. Staff assistance for the Council shall be provided by the
staff of the State Department of Health.
G. H. Violation of any of the provisions of this act or the
rules issued pursuant to this act shall subject the offending

HB2262 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

faci lity to the notice and enforcement provisions established for
the facility's license by the Department.
H. I. Any facility that offers specialized memory or dementia
care through a specific unit or program shall post the disclosure
form, including the information required to be included by this
section, on the facility's website.
I. J. The Department shall establish a website with a list of
those facilities that have filed a disclosure form pursuant to this
act. The website shall contain a link to the submitted disclosure
form and a table containing items from the disclosure form,
including staffing ratios, staff training, special programming and
activities, and accreditations or certifications.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.









HB2262 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.